Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Part B. Proceedings Involving Two or More States

407.5203.
Initiating and responding tribunal of this state.

Under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

, a tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal of another state and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state or a foreign country.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 18; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 6, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 5, effective July 15, 2016.

407.5204.
Simultaneous proceedings.

A tribunal of this state may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed after a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state or a foreign country only if:

The petition or comparable pleading in this state is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the other state or the foreign country for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by the other state or the foreign country;

The contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the other state or the foreign country; and

If relevant, this state is the home state of the child.

A tribunal of this state may not exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed before a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state or a foreign country if:

The petition or comparable pleading in the other state or foreign country is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in this state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by this state;

The contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in this state; and

If relevant, the other state or foreign country is the home state of the child.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 19; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 7, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5205.
Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify child support order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state has and shall exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its child support order if the order is the controlling order and:

At the time of the filing of a request for modification this state is the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued; or

Even if this state is not the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued, the parties consent in a record or in open court that the tribunal of this state may continue to exercise jurisdiction to modify its order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state may not exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the order if:

All of the parties who are individuals file consent in a record with the tribunal of this state that a tribunal of another state that has jurisdiction over at least one (1) of the parties who is an individual or that is located in the state of residence of the child may modify the order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction; or

Its order is not the controlling order.

If a tribunal of another state has issued a child support order pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act as provided in KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

or a law substantially similar to KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

which modifies a child support order of a tribunal of this state, tribunals of this state shall recognize the continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of the tribunal of the other state.

A tribunal of this state that lacks continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify a child support order may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to modify a support order issued in that state.

A temporary support order issued ex parte or pending resolution of a jurisdictional conflict does not create continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in the issuing tribunal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 20; 1998, ch. 101, §§ 2, 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 8, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

407.5206.
Continuing jurisdiction to enforce child support order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

The order if the order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act as provided in KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

; or

A money judgment for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of a tribunal of another state is the controlling order.

A tribunal of this state having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce the order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 21; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 9, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.